Utah statutes.
53-2a-1012.   Rules and regulations -- Approval by Legislature.

The board, commission, or agency designated by the governor for carrying out the provisions of this part is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations as are necessary for effective administration of this part with approval of the Legislature.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 295, 2013 General Session

